Connecticut, session 2026, HB05167.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 19a-37 of the
2 2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (c) (1) Any laboratory or firm which conducts a water quality test on
5 a private well serving a residential property or semipublic well in the
6 state shall, not later than thirty days after the completion of such test,
7 report the results of such test to the local health authority of the
8 municipality where the property is located and the Department of
9 Public Health in a format specified by the department. Results
10 submitted to the Department of Public Health or the local health
11 authority pursuant to this subsection, information obtained from any
12 Department of Public Health or local health authority investigation
13 regarding those results and any Department of Public Health or local
14 health authority study of morbidity and mortality regarding the results
HB5167 / File No. 24 1

HB5167 File No. 24
15 shall be confidential pursuant to section 19a-25, except the local health
16 authority and the department may [, if approved by the commissioner,]
17 disclose the results or information obtained from an investigation of the
18 results to (A) the owner of the property on which the well is located, the
19 owner of any other property that obtains water from the well, and the
20 owner of each property that is adjacent to the property on which the
21 well is located or to any other property that obtains water from the well,
22 (B) a prospective buyer of such property who has signed a contract to
23 purchase such property, (C) other persons or entities, when such
24 disclosure is necessary to carry out a statutory or regulatory
25 responsibility of the local health authority or department, [or] and (D)
26 an agent of a state agency.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-37(c)(1)
PH Joint Favorable
HB5167 / File No. 24 2

HB5167 File No. 24
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes procedural changes regarding the disclosure of certain
water quality test results, resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities.
HB5167 / File No. 24 3

HB5167 File No. 24
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5167
AN ACT CONCERNING THE DISCLOSURE OF WATER QUALITY
TEST RESULTS FOR CERTAIN PRIVATE AND SEMIPUBLIC
WELLS.